Connecticut, session 2026, SB00341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 38a-479b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
1, 2027):
(c) (1) No contracting health organization shall cancel, deny or
demand the return of full or partial payment for an authorized covered
service due to administrative or eligibility error, more than [eighteen]
twelve months after the date of the receipt of a clean claim, except if:
(A) Such organization has a documented basis to believe that such
claim was submitted fraudulently by such provider;
(B) The provider did not bill appropriately for such claim based on
the documentation or evidence of what medical service was actually
provided;
SB341 / File No. 209 1

SB341 File No. 209
(C) Such organization has paid the provider for such claim more than
once;
(D) Such organization paid a claim that should have been or was paid
by a federal or state program; or
(E) The provider received payment for such claim from a different
insurer, payor or administrator through coordination of benefits or
subrogation, or due to coverage under an automobile insurance or
workers' compensation policy. Such provider shall have one year after
the date of the cancellation, denial or return of full or partial payment to
resubmit an adjusted secondary payor claim with such organization on
a secondary payor basis, regardless of such organization's timely filing
requirements.
(2) (A) Such organization shall give at least thirty days' advance
notice to a provider by certified mail, return receipt requested, electronic
mail to such electronic mail address designated by such provider or
facsimile of the organization's cancellation, denial or demand for the
return of full or partial payment pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(B) If such organization demands the return of full or partial payment
from a provider, the notice required under subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision shall disclose to the provider (i) the amount that is
demanded to be returned, (ii) the claim that is the subject of such
demand, and (iii) the basis on which such return is being demanded.
(C) Not later than thirty days after the receipt of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, a provider may appeal such
cancellation, denial or demand in accordance with the procedures
provided by such organization. If any such organization fails to notify
the provider of such organization's determination on such appeal not
later than fifteen business days after receipt of such appeal from such
provider, such appeal shall be construed in favor of such provider. Any
demand for the return of full or partial payment shall be stayed during
the pendency of such appeal.
SB341 / File No. 209 2

SB341 File No. 209
(D) If there is no appeal or an appeal is denied, such provider may
resubmit an adjusted claim, if applicable, to such organization, not later
than thirty days after the receipt of the notice required under
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision or the denial of the appeal,
whichever is applicable, except that if a return of payment was
demanded pursuant to subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, such claim shall not be resubmitted.
(E) A provider shall have one year after the date of the written notice
set forth in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision to identify any other
appropriate insurance coverage applicable on the date of service and to
file a claim with such insurer, health care center or other issuing entity,
regardless of such insurer's, health care center's or other issuing entity's
timely filing requirements.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 38a-479b(c)
INS Joint Favorable
SB341 / File No. 209 3

SB341 File No. 209
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill shortens the period in which a health carrier can demand
return of payment from a health care provider due to error and results
in no fiscal impact to the state.
SB341 / File No. 209 4

SB341 File No. 209
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 341
AN ACT CONCERNING RETURN OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
PAYMENTS.